California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
“Lot,” “portion of lot,” “land,” “piece,” or “parcel of land,” whether used singly or in combination, may, in the discretion of the superintendent of streets, for purposes of spreading assessments and calculating benefits include any contiguous real property under the same ownership as it appears on the last equalized assessment roll used by the assessing entity in which the property is situated, whether consisting of unsubdivided land or land subdivided into blocks or lots and blocks or the superintendent of streets may if requested by such owner make separate assessments against portions of such lots or parcels of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1099.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

“Work” or “improvement” whether used singly or in combination mean and include any work which is authorized to be done or any improvement which is authorized to be made under this division, as well as the construction, reconstruction and repair of all or part of any such work or improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.1.

“Acquisition,” or any of its variants, means one or more of the following:

(a) Any works, improvements, appliances, or facilities which are authorized to be made, constructed, or acquired under this division and which are in existence and installed in place on or before the date of adoption of the resolution of intention for the acquisition thereof; any use or capacity rights in any of the above; and any works, improvements, appliances, or facilities acquired or installed pursuant to Sections 10109 to 10111, inclusive.

(b) Electric current, gas, or other illuminating agent for power or lighting service.

(c) Any real property, rights-of-way, easements, or interests in real property, acquired or to be acquired by gift, purchase, or eminent domain, necessary or convenient in connection with the construction or operation of any work or improvement authorized to be acquired or to be made or constructed under this division, except any real property, rights-of-way, easements, or interests in real property shown on any final map filed with or submitted to the legislative body for acceptance and approval under the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code) and offered for dedication to public use by the map or by any separate offer of dedication previously or subsequently made.

(d) The payment in full of all amounts necessary to eliminate any special assessment liens previously imposed upon any assessment parcel included in the new assessment district. The cost of the payment shall be included in the new assessment on the parcel. This subdivision is applicable only in cases where the acquisition is incidental to other acquisitions or improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.

“Incidental expense” includes all of the following:

(a) Compensation for work done by the engineer, and attorney’s fees or services in proceedings pursuant to this division. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if a court of competent jurisdiction renders a final judgment that invalidates in whole or part the formation of the assessment district or the levy of assessments, any attorney’s fees and engineering charges incurred by the city in defending that litigation are not incidental expenses and shall not be charged against the assessment district in any manner except as to those claims upon which the city prevails and as allowed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) The cost of printing and advertising provided for in this division, including the treasurer’s estimated cost of printing, servicing, and collecting any bonds to be issued to represent or be secured by unpaid assessments.

(c) The compensation of the person appointed by the superintendent of streets to take charge of, and superintend any of, the work.

(d) The expenses of making the assessment, of the collection of assessments by the superintendent of streets when directed by ordinance to receive payments pursuant to Section 5396, and of preparing and typing the resolutions, notices, and other papers and proceedings for any work authorized by this division.

(e) The expenses of making any analyses and tests to determine that the work, and any materials or appliances incorporated therein, comply with the specifications.

(f) All costs and expenses incurred in carrying out the investigations and making the reports required by the provisions of the Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 (Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800)).

(g) The cost of title searching, description writing, right-of-way agent salaries, appraisal fees, partial reconveyance fees, surveys, and sketches incident to securing rights-of-way for any work authorized by this division.

(h) Any other expenses incidental to the construction, completion, and inspection of the work in the manner provided for in this division.

(i) The cost of relocating or altering any public utility facilities as required by the improvement in those cases where that cost is the legal obligation of the city.

(j) The cost of planning and designing public facilities to be financed pursuant to this division, including the cost of environmental evaluations of those facilities.

(k) The cost of filing and recording documents when the cost is the legal obligation of the city.

(l) The cost of any acquisition, as defined in Section 5023.1, and expenses incidental in connection with the acquisition.

(m) If the construction of sewers or appurtenances incident thereto has been ordered, sewer service, connection, and capacity charges established by the city as a condition to the providing of sewer service for the benefit of properties within the assessment district and required for the completion and utilization of the improvement constructed.

(n) If the construction of water improvements or appurtenances incident thereto has been ordered, water service, connection, and capacity charges established by the city as a condition to the providing of water service for the benefit of properties within the assessment district and required for the completion and utilization of the improvement constructed.

(o) All costs not identified in subdivisions (a) to (n), inclusive, related to the issuance of bonds, including, but not limited to, costs of obtaining credit ratings, bond insurance premiums, fees for letters of credit and other credit enhancement costs, and initial fees for the registration of bonds.

All demands for incidental expenses shall be presented to the street superintendent, by an itemized bill, duly verified by the demandant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 168.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.

In all resolutions, notices, orders and determinations, subsequent to the resolution of intention it shall not be necessary to describe the work, and any description of the work in any of the same, subsequent to the resolution of intention and the notice of improvement, shall be sufficient, if it refers to the resolution of intention for a description of the work or improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------

5026.

The legislative body of a county, city or city and county, may by resolution adopt a name for any street, boulevard, park or place which is to be improved under this division, for which a name has not been provided under the provisions of Sections 970.5 and 971, or otherwise, and may by resolution change the name of any street, boulevard, park or place heretofore established; provided further, that a copy of the resolution or order providing for the new name or change of name made by any city shall be promptly forwarded by the city clerk to the clerk of the board of supervisors and county surveyor of the county in which the municipality is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. NOTICE [5050. - 5072.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5050. - 5052.]

5050.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, whenever a notice, resolution, order or other matter is required to be published or posted by this division it shall be published or posted in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.

Whenever any notice, resolution, order, or other matter is required to be published or posted, and the duty of posting or publishing, or procuring the same is not specifically enjoined upon any officer or person, the clerk shall post or procure the publication or posting thereof, as the case may be.

No step in any proceeding shall be invalidated or affected by any error or mistake or departure from the provisions of this section as to the officer or person posting or publishing, or procuring the publication or posting, of any notice, resolution, order or other matter when the same is actually published or posted for the time required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

No notice, nor any publication of any notice, order, resolution or other matter, other than that expressly provided for in this part or elsewhere in this division shall be necessary to give validity to any of the proceedings provided for in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Notice by Publication [5060. - 5063.]

5060.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall not have any application to any publication provided for in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

Whenever in this division a notice, resolution, order or other matter is required to be published and the manner of such publication is not specified, it shall be published in a daily, semiweekly or weekly newspaper published and circulated in the city conducting the proceedings and which is selected by the legislative body for that purpose, or by the clerk or other officer issuing the notice or responsible for the publication where the legislative body has not selected any newspaper for that purpose.

If there is no daily, semiweekly or weekly newspaper published and circulated in the city, and if the city conducting the proceedings is not a county, the notice, resolution, order or other matter required to be published shall be published in some newspaper published in the county in which such city is located.

If the city conducting the proceedings is not a county and there is no newspaper published in the city or in the county in which such city is located, the notice, resolution, order or other matter required to be published shall be posted and kept posted for the same length of time required for the publication of the same in a newspaper, in three public places in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

Whenever in this division a notice, resolution, order or other matter is required to be published, and the time for such publication is not specified, it shall be published in two entire issues of the newspaper, one being on one day and the other issue being on a subsequent day of the same or a subsequent week.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.

Proof of the publication or posting of any notice, resolution, order or other matter in accordance with any of the provisions of this division may be made by affidavit of:

(a) The owner, publisher, printer, foreman or clerk of the newspaper in which the publication was made.

(b) The poster of the notice.

(c) A person having knowledge of the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Notice by Posting [5065. - 5065.]

5065.

Whenever in this division notice is required to be given by posting and the time or method for such posting is not specified, the clerk shall conspicuously post the notice on or near the door of the council chamber for not less than five days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Notice by Mail [5070. - 5072.]

5070.

Whenever in this division notice is required to be given by mail, notice shall be given in accordance with the provisions of Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.

The clerk shall upon the completion of the mailing of the notice file with the legislative body an affidavit setting forth the time and manner of the compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.

The failure of the clerk to mail any notice or the failure of any person to receive the same shall not affect in any way whatsoever the validity of any proceedings taken under this division, nor prevent the legislative body from proceeding with any hearing so noticed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. PERFORMING THE WORK [5100. - 5954.]



  CHAPTER 1. Work Which May Be Done [5100. - 5105.]

5100.

(a) All streets, places, public ways, or property, or rights-of-way, or tidelands, or submerged lands owned by any city, open or dedicated to public use, and any property for which an order for possession prior to judgment has been obtained, and all tidelands or submerged lands to which all the right, title, and interest of the state have been granted to any city, all tidelands or submerged lands for which a permit, license, or easement has been issued by the United States Army Corps of Engineers or the state for work to be done pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 5101, and all tidelands or submerged lands which have been leased by the state to any city for the construction of improvements authorized by subdivision (g) of Section 5101, are open public streets, places, public ways, or
 property or rights-of-way owned by the city, for the purposes of this division, and the legislative body of the city may establish and change the grades of the respective ways, properties, and rights-of-way hereinbefore enumerated and fix the width thereof and is hereby invested with jurisdiction to order to be done therein, over or thereon, either singly or in any combination thereof, any of the work mentioned in this division under the proceedings described in this part.

(b) Nothing in this section shall supersede the legislative body’s obligation to obtain a lease or permit from the State Lands Commission for the use of state-owned tidelands or submerged lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 88.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

Whenever, in the opinion of the legislative body, the public interest or convenience may require, it may order the whole or any portion, either in length or in width, of any one or more of the streets, places, public ways, or property, easements, or rights-of-way, or tidelands, or submerged lands owned by any city, or tidelands or submerged lands leased by the state to any city for the construction of improvements authorized by subdivision (g), open or dedicated to public use, and any property for which an order for possession prior to judgment has been obtained, to be improved by or have constructed therein, over, or thereon, either singly or in any combination thereof, any of the following:

(a) The grading or regrading, the paving or repaving, the planking or replanking, the macadamizing or remacadamizing, the graveling or regraveling, or the oiling or reoiling thereof.

(b) The construction or reconstruction of sidewalks, crosswalks, steps, safety zones, platforms, seats, statuary, fountains, parks and parkways, recreation areas, including all structures, buildings, and other facilities necessary to make parks and parkways and recreation areas useful for the purposes for which intended, culverts, bridges, curbs, gutters, tunnels, subways, or viaducts.

(c) Sanitary sewers or instrumentalities of sanitation, together with the necessary outlets, cesspools, manholes, catch basins, flush tanks, septic tanks, disposal plants, connecting sewers, ditches, drains, conduits, tunnels, channels, or other appurtenances.

(d) Drains, tunnels, sewers, conduits, culverts, and channels for drainage purposes, together with necessary outlets, cesspools, manholes, catch basins, flush tanks, septic tanks, disposal plants, connecting sewers, ditches, drains, conduits, channels, and appurtenances.

(e) Poles, posts, wires, pipes, conduits, tunnels, lamps, and other suitable or necessary appliances for the purpose of lighting the streets, places, or public ways of any such city or property or rights-of-way owned by any such city, or for the purpose of furnishing electricity and electric service or telephone service to property within a city.

(f) Pipes, hydrants, and appliances for fire protection.

(g) Breakwaters, levees, bulkheads, groins, and walls of rock or other material to protect the streets, places, public ways, and other property in any such city, from overflow by water, or to prevent beach erosion or to promote accretion to beaches.

(h) Wells, pumps, dams, reservoirs, storage tanks, channels, tunnels, conduits, pipes, hydrants, meters, or other appurtenances for supplying or distributing a domestic water supply.

(i) Mains, services, pipes, fittings, valves, regulators, governors, meters, drips, drains, tanks, ditches, tunnels, conduits, channels, or other appurtenances for supplying or distributing a domestic or industrial gas supply.

(j) The construction or maintenance of bomb shelters or fallout shelters that are primarily designed to protect and shelter the population from conventional or nuclear bomb or missile warhead explosions, shellfire, radiation, and fallout in the event of an enemy attack.

(k) Retaining walls, embankments, buildings, and any other structures or facilities necessary or suitable in connection with any of the work mentioned in this section.

(l) The planting of trees, shrubs, or other ornamental vegetation.

(m) The construction, repairing, maintaining, or improving of public mooring places for watercraft, channel improvements, and the building, repairing, maintaining, and improving of wharves, piers, docks, slips, quays, moles, port access routes, or other utilities, structures, and appliances necessary or convenient for the promotion or accommodation of commerce, navigation, and the protection of lands within the city, and for aiding and securing access to the waters of those lands to the people of the State of California, in the exercise of their rights to fish, or for the extension of public streets or places.

(n) Compaction of land, change of grade or contours, construction of caissons, retaining walls, drains, and other structures suitable for the purpose of stabilizing land.

(o) All other work that may be deemed necessary to improve the whole or any portion of those streets, places, public ways, property, easements, or rights-of-way owned by the city.

(p) All other work auxiliary to any of the above, which may be required to carry out the above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 338.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.4.

In the case of a proposal for a water supply system or sanitary sewers and facilities, the preliminary steps, including, but not limited to, environmental impact reports, feasibility studies, engineering plans, cost estimates, legal expenses, and elections, may, at the legislative body’s discretion, be deemed to be improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 630, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.5.

Whenever in the opinion of the legislative body the public interest or convenience may require, it may install, acquire, construct, develop, jointly develop, maintain, dispose of, or operate, in or along its streets or any public way or any easement, either singly or in any combination of the items mentioned in Section 5101 and this section, any of the following:

(a) Works, systems, or facilities for the transportation of people, including rolling stock and other equipment appurtenant thereto.

(b) All other work auxiliary or incidental to any of the above, which may be required to carry out the same, including terminal and intermediate stations, structures, or platforms, or other facilities which may be necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, the loading of people into and unloading of people from the transportation facilities.

(c) All other work auxiliary or incidental to any of the above which may be necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for carrying out, the same.

(d) Any and all property, easements, rights-of-way, and other rights or interests which may be necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for carrying out, the purposes of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.6.

Following the levy of an assessment pursuant to this division to pay, in whole or in part, the costs and expenses of works, system or facilities authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 5101.5 upon a district benefited thereby, and annually on or before June 30th, the legislative body may prepare and approve an estimate of the expenditures required during the ensuing fiscal year for the maintenance, operation, repair and improvement of such works, system or facilities and shall deduct from such estimate the amount of revenues, if any, which the legislative body estimates will accrue during such year from the operation of such works, system or facilities and will be available to pay costs of such maintenance, operation, repair and improvement.

The legislative body may increase the assessment in accordance with the provisions of Section 53753 of the Government Code. The proceeds of the assessment shall be placed in a separate fund of the city and shall be expended only for the maintenance, operation, repair or improvement of such works, system or facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.7.

The legislative body of a city may order the construction and installation of improvements authorized by Section 5101 in the right-of-way of a state highway or county road, or in a railroad right-of-way which is located within or adjacent to the corporate boundaries of the city, or in the right-of-way of a county road which is or will be an extension of a street, public way, or right-of-way of the city, if the legislative body determines that the public interest or convenience requires the construction and installation and that the land within an assessment district to be assessed to pay the cost and expenses of the improvements is benefited thereby. The construction and installation of the improvements in the right-of-way may be performed pursuant to a permit, license, lease, easement, or right-of-way granted to the city by the public entity or corporation having jursidiction and control over the highway, road, or right-of-way. The legislative body of the city may establish and change the grades of the highway, road, or right-of-way, or portion thereof, where the improvement will be constructed in cooperation with the public entity or corporation having jurisdiction and control over the highway, road, or right-of-way. Before ordering the construction and installation of the improvements, the city shall obtain the approval of the public entity or corporation having jurisdiction and control over the highway, road, or right-of-way. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the legislative body shall not order the construction or improvement of a segment of a state highway except as provided in Section 5101.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   Effective June 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.8.

(a) The legislative body of a city may order the construction and improvement of a segment of a state highway located, in whole or in part, within the city’s jurisdiction, if the following conditions have been met:

(1) The legislative body has made a determination that the public interest or convenience requires the state highway project, and that the land within an assessment district to be assessed to pay the cost and expenses of the state highway project will be benefited.

(2) The legislative body has entered a cooperative agreement with the Department of Transportation, as provided in subdivision (b), to fund the construction and improvement of the state highway.

(3) The highway project has been included in the state transportation improvement program pursuant to Section 14529 of the Government Code.

(b) The cooperative agreement required by subdivision (a) shall provide for: 

(1) The Department of Transportation to perform the construction of the project.

(2) The city funding of the costs and expenses of the project from the assessment to be levied on the land within the assessment district to be assessed, and from the sale of any bonds which may be issued pursuant to this division or Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500).

(3) The agreement to become effective after proceedings have been taken pursuant to this division and the funds are available to carry out all its terms.

(4) The division of financial and legal responsibility between the city and the Department of Transportation for the maintenance of the state highway improvements and encroachments upon completion of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 106, Sec. 3.   Effective June 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

In any proceeding for the making of any work or improvement authorized under Section 5101 of this code, the legislative body may order any acquisition as defined in Section 5023.1 necessary or appropriate in connection with such work or improvement and assess the cost of such acquisition, as a part of the incidental expenses of such work or improvement. Any such acquisition shall be described in the resolution of intention in general terms and refer to plans, profiles, detailed drawings and specifications or such of them as may be suitable and proper for the full detailed description of the acquisition proposed. The city initiating such proceedings is authorized to advance the cost of any such acquisition from its general funds, and thereafter reimburse such general funds as a part of the incidental expenses of such improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 604.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

Whenever the work or improvement includes the installation of works or appliances for supplying electric, telephone, or cable television service, sanitary sewers or instrumentalities of sanitation, domestic or industrial water supplies, or mains and appurtenances for supplying or distributing a domestic or industrial gas supply, and the territory in which the work or improvement is contemplated is within the service area of a public utility, public agency, or mutual water company supplying the service, the legislative body may, before the adoption of the resolution of intention, enter into an agreement with the public utility, public agency, or mutual water company which may, among other things, provide for all of the following:

(a) The supplying or approval by the public utility, public agency, or mutual water company of plans and specifications for the work or improvement.

(b) The performance of work or service, for an allowance or contribution by the public utility, public agency, or mutual water company toward the cost of the work or service where provided for by its rules or regulations, and for the payment for the work or service.

(c) That the agreement shall become effective upon the effective date of the resolution or ordinance ordering the work in proceedings taken pursuant to this division.

(d) That, after the confirmation of the assessment, the public utility, public agency, or mutual water company shall have exclusive possession, control, and use of the work or improvement as long as the public utility, public agency, or mutual water company uses the work or improvement to render to the lands within the assessment district the services intended to be furnished by the work or improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

If the written consent of the owner of the property is first obtained, work may be done on private property to eliminate any disparity in level or size between the improvement and private property, provided that the legislative body determines in the resolution of intention to order the improvement that it is in the public interest and more economical to do such work on private property than to adjust the work on public property to eliminate such disparity. The actual cost of such work may be added to the assessment of the lot on which the work is done. Nothing in this section limits or restricts the authority of the legislative body to make agreements authorized by Section 1263.610 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

(a) Whenever, in the opinion of the legislative body, the public interest or convenience may require, the legislative body may undertake any work necessary or incidental to the prevention, mitigation, abatement, or control of a geologic hazard or to repair damages resulting therefrom.

(b) For purposes of this division, “geologic hazard” means an actual or threatened landslide, land subsidence, soil erosion, earthquake, or any natural or unnatural movement of land or earth.

(c) Such work may be performed on private property with the prior written consent of the owner thereof, if the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, determines that it is in the public interest to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 771, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Elections [5108. - 5108.5.]

5108.

Approval of the owners of land for any improvements specified in Section 5101.4 shall be secured in accordance with the provisions of Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.3.

The proposition is approved if a majority of the voters voting approve the measure.

If the measure is approved by the voters, assessments shall be made and confirmed pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 5340) and Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 5360) and may be collected pursuant to Section 5450. The legislative body may pay the cost of the work described in Section 5101.4 prior to the collection of assessments.

Any assessment imposed pursuant to this section may be collected in installments over a period not to exceed five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.4.

Notwithstanding Section 5108.3, the legislative body may delay the collection of the assessments imposed by Section 5108.3 until the time an assessment district is created pursuant to Section 5180 to pay the costs of a water supply system project, or a sanitary sewer and facilities project, where the costs of proposed improvements for such a project have been approved pursuant to Section 5108.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.5.

If an assessment district is created pursuant to Section 5180, the legislative body shall include the assessments imposed by Section 5108.3 with the assessments imposed by Section 5180 within an assessment district created to pay the costs of a water supply system, or a sanitary sewer and facilities project, where the costs of proposed improvements for such a project have been approved pursuant to Section 5108.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Extending Work Beyond City Limits [5115. - 5119.]

5115.

When the public interest or convenience so requires, and whenever, in the opinion of the legislative body initiating the proceedings, the proposed work is of such a character that it directly and peculiarly affects property in two or more cities, or in one or more cities and counties, and that the purposes sought to be accomplished by the work can best be accomplished by a single, comprehensive scheme of work, there is hereby conferred upon the legislative body full power and authority to extend the work or the boundaries of the district to be assessed therefor beyond the territorial limits of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.

The legislative body may establish, change or modify the grade of and order to be done in, over or under the whole, or any portion, either in length or width, of any one or more of the public streets, places, sidewalks, highways, roads, or property or rights of way (including tidelands and submerged lands owned by any city) within the limits of the city which is carrying through the proceeding in question, and also into the limits of other cities or extending from the city through or over one or more other cities, or extending through or over one or more cities and into a county or extending along the exterior boundary between a city and a county, or along the boundary between two cities, whether wholly or partly within or without the boundary, either singly or in any combination thereof, any of the work mentioned in this division under the proceedings described in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5117.

The city may include within the boundaries of an assessment district created pursuant to this division lands lying within the boundaries of any one or more cities, or counties, when such lands, in the opinion of the legislative body conducting the proceeding, will be benefited by the proposed work if the consent of the legislative body of any territory proposed to be assessed shall first be obtained to the formation of the assessment district and, if any of the proposed work is to be done within such territory, to the work described in the resolution of intention and the assumption of jursidiction thereover for the purposes aforesaid prior to the adoption thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5118.

The proposed resolution of intention shall be submitted to the legislative bodies which have jurisdiction over the territory into which the proposed work or the assessment district therefor may extend. When the resolution of intention is approved and the consent of the legislative bodies whose consent is necessary is obtained to the work and the formation of the assessment district described therein, the resolution of intention may be adopted. The consent if any shall, of itself, constitute assent to the assumption of jurisdiction thereover for all purposes of the proceeding and authorize the legislative body initiating the proceeding to take each and every step required for or suitable for the consummation of the work extending outside the limits of the city, and the levying, collecting and enforcement of the assessments to cover the expenses thereof and the issuance and enforcement of bonds to represent unpaid assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5119.

Notwithstanding any other provision, upon obtaining the consent of any city as provided in Sections 5117 and 5118, the board of supervisors of a county may order any work and levy, collect and enforce assessments and issue and enforce assessment bonds to represent unpaid assessments in an assessment district created by it lying wholly within such city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Contribution Toward Cost of Work [5125. - 5129.]

5125.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, the legislative body may accept and provide for contribution toward the cost and expenses of any work done under this division, from any funds made available for the purpose by any local, state or national agency or authority, and it shall not be necessary to set forth or give notice of such contribution in the resolution of intention or in any other proceedings under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5126.

At any time or times prior to confirmation of the assessment, the legislative body of a city conducting a proceeding may provide for a contribution or contributions by said city of part of the costs and expenses of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5127.

If the assessment district includes property out of the territorial jurisdiction of the city conducting the proceeding, the legislative body of the city having jurisdiction thereover may in its discretion order by resolution, a copy of which shall be transmitted to the legislative body conducting the proceeding, that any part of the cost or expenses of the work shall be paid out of the treasury of the city. A liability for the portion of the cost set forth in the resolution shall thereby be created against the city ordering such contribution.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5119 by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5128.

The legislative body may, in its discretion, provide that any contribution being made pursuant to Sections 5125 and 5126 may, to the extent of the fund so designated, be appropriated in such installments as the legislative body may determine provided that the total amount of such installments shall have been appropriated at or prior to the completion of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1235.)
-------------------------------------------

5129.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the legislative body, by resolution and in accordance with the terms and conditions under which federal funds were made available to it for the benefit of low- and moderate-income households owning and occupying lands, may apply those federal funds to the payment of assessments levied on such lands to finance any work done under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Resolution of Intention [5130. - 5136.]

5130.

Before ordering any work to be done under this division the legislative body shall require, except as provided hereunder, the engineer to furnish it with plans and specifications therefor together with careful estimates of the costs and expenses of such work.
